Utah statutes.
58-56-9.   Qualifications of inspectors -- Contract for inspection services.

(1) An inspector employed by a local regulator, state regulator, or compliance agency to enforce the codes adopted or approved pursuant to this chapter shall:

(a) (i)  meet minimum qualifications as established by the division in collaboration with the commission;

(ii)  be certified by a nationally recognized organization which promulgates codes adopted under this chapter; or

(iii)  pass an examination developed by the division in collaboration with the commission;

(b)  be currently licensed by the division as meeting those minimum qualifications; and

(c)  be subject to revocation or suspension of the inspector's license or being placed on probation if found guilty of unlawful or unprofessional conduct.

(2)  A local regulator, state regulator, or compliance agency may contract for the services of a licensed inspector not regularly employed by the regulator or agency.

(3)  The division shall use the money received under Subsection (4) to provide education:

(a)  regarding the codes and code amendments that under Section 58-56-4 are adopted, approved, or being considered for adoption or approval; and

(b)  to:

(i)  building inspectors; and

(ii)  individuals engaged in construction-related trades or professions.

(4) (a)  A compliance agency shall:

(i)  charge a 1% surcharge on a building permit it issues; and

(ii)  transmit 80% of the amount collected to the division to be used by the division to fulfill the requirements of Subsection (3).

(b)  The surcharge shall be deposited as a dedicated credit.

